District of Columbia statutes.
2-1517.52

Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services behavioral health and compliance report.

The Mayor shall submit a report to the Council by March 30 of each year, which shall include:

(1)

The number of youth:

(A)

Who were committed to the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services (“DYRS”) during the previous calendar year;

(B)

Who received the required behavioral health screening;

(C)

Whose behavioral health screening identified a need for further behavioral health assessment;

(D)

Who received a behavioral health assessment; and

(E)

Who were referred to appropriate services;

(2)

The reasons why a committed youth in DYRS did not receive the required behavioral health screening or behavioral health assessment, if any; and

(3)

If necessary, recommendations on how DYRS can ensure that all of its committed youth are receiving the required behavioral health screenings and behavioral health assessments along with an estimate of the time it will take to meet that requirement.

History

June 7, 2012, D.C. Law 19-141, § 503, 59 DCR 3083

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 4111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle K of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “South Capitol Street Memorial Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7004, provided that §§ 302(b)(1), 304, and 502(a) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 20-61, § 4112, provided that §§ 302(b)(1)(A) and (C) and 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 shall apply to public charter schools upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register. Section 302(b)(1)(A) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(A-i); Section 302(b)(1)(C) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(B-i); and Section 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 added 5 DCMR § A2103(c)(6).